Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.756

DNA identification system—Analysis, assistance, and testimony services.

The Washington state patrol forensic laboratory services bureau may:

(1) Provide DNA analysis services to law enforcement agencies throughout the state;

(2) Provide assistance to law enforcement officials and prosecutors in the preparation and utilization of DNA evidence for presentation in court; and

(3) Provide expert testimony in court on DNA evidentiary issues.

[ 2008 c 97 s 4; 1989 c 350 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Funding limitations—1989 c 350: See notes following RCW 43.43.752.